Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-105
Donations to railroad corporations; conditions; noncompliance; effect.

No proposition shall be submitted to the electors of any county for donations of bonds or any other valuables to any railroad corporation, unless said railroad corporation, through its authorized and responsible agent, files for record in the county clerk's office, where such donations of bonds or any other valuables are to be voted upon, a plat of the survey showing the exact line of route through said county, within at least two weeks previous to such election; and no such bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, or donations, shall be valid if they are voted, unless said railroad corporation builds its line of road within forty rods of the survey as filed in the county clerk's office.

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 151;

R.S.1913, § 370;

C.S.1922, § 287;

C.S.1929, § 11-106;

R.S.1943, § 10-105.